hu: Dobókötél-tároló/-csomagolás típusa: Tartály/tok; Tekercselt (táska nélkül); Orsó/dob; Mentőgyűrű/táska kombó; Dobózsák; Egyéb
vi: Loại hình lưu trữ/đóng gói dây ném: Hộp/túi đựng; Cuộn (không túi); Rulo/ống cuộn; Bộ phao cứu sinh/túi; Túi ném; Khác
zh-CN: 抛绳收纳/包装类型: 罐/盒; 盘绕（无袋子）; 卷轴/线轴; 救援环/抛绳包组合; 抛绳包; 其他
tr: Atma ipi saklama/ambalaj tipi: Kutu/çanta; Sarılı (çantasız); Makara; Kurtarma simidi/çantası kombosu; Fırlatma çantası; Diğer
fr: Type de rangement ou de conditionnement de la corde de sauvetage: Boîte/étui; Enroulée (sans sac); Bobine; Combiné bouée de sauvetage/sac; Sac de jet; Autre
sk-SK: Úložný priestor/typ balenia na vrhacie lano: Kanister/puzdro; Zmotané (bez tašky); Navijak/cievka; Kombinácia záchranného kolesa a tašky; Vrhacie vrecko; Iné
da: Opbevarings- eller emballagetype for kasteline: Beholder/etui; Oprullet (ingen taske); Spole; Kombineret redningskrans/taske; Kasteline-taske; Andet
ru: Тип хранения или упаковки спасательного линя: Контейнер/чехол; В бухте (без сумки); Катушка/бобина; Спасательный круг/сумка (комплект); Сумка-бросалка; Другое
nl: Werplijn opslag-/verpakkingstype: Bus/koffer; Opgerold (geen tas); Haspel/spoel; Reddingsring-/tascombinatie; Werpzak; Overige
nb: Oppbevaring/emballasjetype for kastetau: Beholder/etui; Kveilet (uten pose); Trommel/spole; Kombinasjon av redningsring/pose; Kastelinepose; Annet
ko: 투척용 로프 보관/포장 유형: 캐니스터/케이스; 코일형(가방 없음); 릴/스풀; 구조용 링/가방 콤보; 스로우 백; 기타
lt-LT: Metamosios virvės laikymo / pakuotės tipas: Konteineris / dėklas; Suvyniota (be krepšio); Ritė; Gelbėjimo žiedo / krepšio rinkinys; Metamas krepšys; Kitas
cs: Úložný prostor na házecí lano / typ balení: Pouzdro/obal; Svinuté (bez vaku); Naviják/cívka; Kombinace záchranného kruhu / vaku; Házecí pytlík; Ostatní
sv: Typ av förvaring/förpackning för kastrep: Behållare/väska; Upprullad (utan påse); Rulle/spole; Livboj/kastlinepåse-kombo; Kastlinepåse; Annat
hr-HR: Vrsta skladištenja/pakiranja užeta za bacanje: Spremnik/kutija; Namotano (bez torbe); Kolut/špula; Kombinacija prstena i torbe za spašavanje; Torba za bacanje; Ostalo
de: Aufbewahrungs-/Verpackungsart des Wurfseils: Behälter/Koffer; Aufgewickelt (ohne Tasche); Rolle/Spule; Rettungsring-/Taschen-Kombination; Wurfsack; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de armazenamento/embalagem da corda de lançamento: Recipiente/estojo; Enrolada (sem saco); Carretel/bobina; Combinação de anel/saco de resgate; Saco de resgate; Outro
it: Tipo di stoccaggio/imballaggio della cima da lancio: Contenitore/custodia; Arrotolata (senza borsa); Mulinello/bobina; Combinazione salvagente anulare/borsa; Borsa da lancio; Altro
ja: スローロープ収納/パッケージタイプ: キャニスター/ケース; コイル状 (バッグなし); リール/スプール; レスキューリング/バッグコンボ; スローバッグ; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta shranjevanja/pakiranja reševalne (metalne) vrvi: Posoda/etui; Zvita (brez vreče); Kolut/tuljava; Kombinacija reševalnega obroča in vreče; Vreča z vrvjo; Drugo
pt-BR: Corda de arremesso tipo de armazenamento/embalagem: Recipiente/estojo; Enrolado (sem bolsa); Carretel/bobina; Combo anel/bolsa de resgate; Bolsa de arremesso; Outros
th: ประเภทการจัดเก็บ/บรรจุภัณฑ์เชือกขว้าง: กระป๋อง/เคส; ขดม้วน (ไม่มีถุง); รอก/ม้วนหลอด; ชุดห่วงยาง/ถุงกู้ชีพ; ถุงเชือกกู้ภัย; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de almacenamiento/embalaje de la cuerda de lanzamiento: Bote/estuche; Enrollada (sin bolsa); Carrete/bobina; Combinación de anillo de rescate/bolsa; Bolsa de rescate; Otro
ro-RO: Tip de depozitare/ambalare pentru parâma de salvare: Recipient/Casetă; Înfășurată (fără geantă); Rolă/Tambur; Combo colac de salvare/sac; Sac de aruncare; Altele
bg-BG: Тип на съхранение/опаковка на спасително хвърлящо въже: Кутия/калъф; Навито (без чанта); Макара/ролка; Комбинация спасителен пояс/чанта; Торбичка за хвърляне; Друго
el: Τύπος αποθήκευσης/συσκευασίας σχοινιού ρίψης: Δοχείο/θήκη; Σε κουλούρα (χωρίς τσάντα); Καρούλι/μπομπίνα; Συνδυασμός σωσιβίου/τσάντας διάσωσης; Τσάντα διάσωσης με σχοινί; Άλλο
en: Throw rope storage/packaging type: Canister/case; Coiled (no bag); Reel/spool; Rescue ring/bag combo; Throw bag; Other
fi: Heittoköyden säilytys-/pakkaustyyppi: Kanisteri/kotelo; Vyyhdillä (ei pussia); Kela; Pelastusrengas/pussiyhdistelmä; Heittopussi; Muu
zh-TW: 拋繩收納/包裝類型: 罐裝/盒裝; 盤捲式 (無袋); 捲軸; 救援環/拋繩袋組合; 拋繩袋; 其他
pl: Sposób przechowywania/pakowania liny ratunkowej: Kanister/pojemnik; Zwijana (bez pokrowca); Bęben/szpula; Zestaw: koło ratunkowe z workiem; Worek rzutki; Inne